Hawaii statutes.
[§321‑33] Shaken baby
syndrome. (a) Any hospital that provides medical care to a newborn may
provide each parent of the newborn with written educational information
approved by the department of health and provided by nonprofit organizations
about the dangerous effects of shaken baby syndrome and the different methods
of preventing shaken baby syndrome.

(b) For the purpose of this section:

"Hospital" includes:

(1) An institution with an organized medical staff,
regulated under section 321‑11(10), that admits patients for inpatient
care, diagnosis, observation, and treatment; and

(2) A health facility under chapter 323F.

"Medical care" means every type of
care, treatment, surgery, hospitalization, attendance, service, and supplies as
the nature of the injury or condition requires.

"Parent" includes a biological mother
or father, foster mother or foster father, adoptive mother or adoptive father,
and stepmother or stepfather.

"Shaken baby syndrome" means an
injury caused by the vigorous shaking of an infant or young child that may
result in injuries such as subdural [hematoma], head injury, irreversible brain
damage, blindness, retinal hemorrhage, eye damage, cerebral palsy, hearing
loss, spinal cord injury, paralysis, seizures, learning disability, central
nervous system injury, rib fracture, or death. [L 2007, c 216, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next